Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-104.03
Child born out of wedlock; filing with putative father registry; department; notice; to whom given.

Within three days after the filing of a Request for Notification of Intended Adoption or a Notice of Objection to Adoption and Intent to Obtain Custody with the putative father registry pursuant to sections 43-104.01 and 43-104.02, the Department of Health and Human Services shall cause a certified copy of such request or notice to be mailed by certified mail to the mother or prospective mother of such child at the last-known address shown on the request or notice or an agent specifically designated in writing by the mother or prospective mother to receive such request or notice.

Laws 1975, LB 224, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 49;

Laws 1995, LB 712, § 23;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 107;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 65;

Laws 2022, LB741, § 9.